Ohio, session 136, HB433.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That sections 905.39, 905.55, 905.59, 915.14, 917.20, 918.12, 923.43, 923.47, 924.07, 924.53, 993.01, 993.04, 1327.52, 1327.55, 3715.04, 4707.091, and 4707.151 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 905.39. (A) The director of agriculture shall inspect and sample any fertilizer within the state to such an extent as the director considers necessary and make an analysis where need is indicated to determine whether the fertilizer is in compliance with sections 905.31 to 905.503 of the Revised Code and rules. The director may enter upon any public or private premises or conveyances during regular business hours in order to have access to fertilizer subject to sections 905.31 to 905.503 of the Revised Code and rules. (B) The director shall maintain the services necessary to effectively administer and enforce sections 905.31 to 905.503 of the Revised Code and rules. The methods of sampling and analysis shall be those adopted by the association of official analytical chemists AOAC international or other sources prescribed by the director. (C) The results of official analysis of any sample of fertilizer found to be in violation of any provisions of sections 905.31 to 905.503 of the Revised Code or any rule shall be forwarded to the licensee or registrant. A licensee or registrant may request a portion of any such sample, provided that the request is made not more than thirty days after the date of the analysis report. (D) Analytical tolerances shall be governed by rules. (E) If the director is denied access to any premises where access is sought for the purpose of inspection and sampling, the director may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to the premises for that purpose. The court, upon application, may issue the search warrant for the purpose requested. Sec. 905.55. (A) No person shall distribute or sell liming material in packages that do not bear a label in legibly written or printed form that includes the following: (1) Net weight of contents in pounds as determined by a sealed weighing device; (2) Product name and type of liming material, which shall include the grade as defined in section 905.54 of the Revised Code, for all except the oxide and hydrate forms; (3) Name and address of manufacturer, seller, or distributor; (4) Guaranteed analysis, in whole numbers only, which includes: (a) The minium percentages of weight of elemental calcium and magnesium; (b) The total neutralizing power expressed as weight per cent of calcium carbonate, as determined by the methods prescribed by the association of official analytical chemistsAOAC international; (c) The minimum percentages of weight passing through numbers eight, twenty, sixty, and one hundred United States standard sieves; (d) The effective neutralizing power expressed on the basis of pounds per ton as a percentage of the fineness index, multiplied by the total neutralizing power and percentage of dry matter. (B) No person shall sell or distribute liming material in bulk, unless the purchaser is supplied, upon delivery, with a delivery ticket containing the information required in division (A) of this section, and: (1) The name and address of the purchaser; (2) The date of sale. (C) Shipping invoices or notices shall be available for all bulk liming material stored at locations other than a place of manufacture. Sec. 905.59. (A) The director of agriculture may inspect, sample, and analyze any liming material utilized within the state to such extent as the director considers necessary to determine whether the liming material is in compliance with sections 905.51 to 905.65 of the Revised Code, and the rules adopted under such sections. The director may enter into an agreement with a person that is not a department of agriculture employee that authorizes that person to perform the inspections, sampling, and analysis of liming material. If the director enters into an agreement, the director shall annually audit the records relating to the inspections, sampling, and analysis performed by the person. (B) The director or a person who has entered into an agreement with the director under division (A) of this section may enter upon any public or private premises or means of conveyance at any reasonable time to have access to liming material subject to sections 905.51 to 905.65 of the Revised Code, and the rules adopted under such sections. (C) The methods of sampling and analysis of liming materials shall be those adopted by the association of official analytical chemists AOAC international or as prescribed by the director. (D) The results of the official analysis of any sample of liming material that is found to be in violation of sections 905.51 to 905.65 of the Revised Code, or any regulation adopted under such sections, shall be forwarded to the licensee. A licensee may request a portion of any such sample if the request is made not more than thirty days after the date of the analysis report. (E) Analytical tolerances shall be governed by rules adopted by the director, subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 915.14. As used in sections 915.14 to 915.24 of the Revised Code, unless the context otherwise requires: (A) "Food" means: (1) Articles used for food or drink for humans or animals; (2) Chewing gum; (3) Articles used for components of any such articles. (B) "Establishment" means any business location or building of which any of the following facilities or operations are a part: a frozen food manufacturing facility, chill room, sharp freezing room and facilities, or sharp freezing cabinet. "Establishment" does not include a bakery registered under section 911.02 of the Revised Code. (C) "Chill room" means a room or space in an establishment used for the purpose of chilling food in preparation for processing for sharp freezing. (D) "Sharp freezing" means the reducing of every portion of food placed in a sharp freezer facility to a temperature of ten degrees Fahrenheit or less in five hours or less. (E) "Sharp freezing room," "sharp freezing cabinet," or "other sharp freezing facilities" means any location, space, or facility in an establishment used for the sharp freezing of food for storage or eventual sale. (F) "Operator" means any person, firm, or corporation operating or maintaining an establishment. (G) "Frozen food manufacturing facility" means a room or space in an establishment used to freeze food, other than frozen desserts as defined in section 917.01 of the Revised Code, for eventual sale in a frozen state. Sec. 917.20. A test report or document prepared by an analyst who is employed or designated by the director of agriculture and who tested a sample shall be admissible as evidence in a prosecution for a violation of a statute or rule, provided that the report or document contains a sworn statement, signed by the analyst, that the report or document accurately contains or represents the findings or conclusions of the analyst. Sec. 918.12. (A) An establishment, as defined in section 918.01 of the Revised Code, that slaughters or otherwise prepares meat of bison, cervidea, other bovidea, camelidae and hybrids thereof, ratites, domestic rabbits, monitored captive deer, captive deer with status, or captive deer with certified chronic wasting disease status as defined in section 943.01 of the Revised Code, domestic deer as defined in section 1531.01 of the Revised Code, or other animals determined by the director of agriculture by rule for human food purposes may receive voluntary state inspection, as defined in division (B) of section 918.01 of the Revised Code, if the establishment complies with sections 918.01 to 918.11 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under those sections for establishments that slaughter or otherwise prepare for food purposes other animals and if the establishment complies with division (C) of this section. (B) The owner of an establishment, as defined in section 918.21 of the Revised Code, who slaughters or otherwise prepares the meat of pheasant, quail, partridge, peafowl, grouse, captive raised wild turkey, captive raised waterfowl, or other poultry determined by the director by rule may receive voluntary state inspection as defined in division (I) of section 918.21 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under those sections for establishments that slaughter or otherwise prepare for food purposes other poultry and if the establishment complies with division (C) of this section and sections 918.21 to 918.28 of the Revised Code. (C) An establishment that receives voluntary state inspection under division (A) or (B) of this section shall pay the costs of the inspection at a rate and under terms established by rule of the director of agriculture in accordance with section 918.04 of the Revised Code. Sec. 923.43. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section for a customer-formula feed, a commercial feed distributed in this state shall be labeled with the following information: (1) Net weight of contents, which may be stated in metric units in addition to avoirdupois weight; (2) Product name, and brand name if any, under which the feed is distributed; (3) Name and principal address of the manufacturer or distributor; (4) Guaranteed analysis of the feed stated in terms that the director of agriculture, by rule, determines are required to advise the user of the composition of the feed or to support claims made in the labeling. In all cases, the substances or elements shall be determinable by laboratory methods published by the association of official analytical chemistsAOAC international. (5) Common name of each ingredient used in the manufacture of the feed. The director, by rule, may permit the use of a collective term for a group of ingredients all of which perform the same function or eliminate the listing of feed ingredients when it no longer serves a useful purpose. (6) Directions for the safe and effective use of any feed that contains any drug and for any other feed that the director, by rule, determines to require such directions; (7) Any precautionary statements that the director, by rule, determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the feed. (B) A customer-formula feed distributed in this state shall be labeled with the following information: (1) Name and principal address of the manufacturer; (2) Name and address of the purchaser; (3) Date of delivery; (4) Product name, and brand name if any, of each commercial feed and all other ingredients used in the mixture; (5) Net weight of each commercial feed used and of any other feed ingredient used; (6) Directions for the safe and effective use of any customer-formula feed that contains any drug and for any other customer-formula feed that the director, by rule, determines to require such directions; (7) If a drug-containing product is used, a statement of the purpose of the drug, the established name of each active drug ingredient, and the amount of each drug used in the final mixture; (8) Any precautionary statements that the director, by rule, determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the customer-formula feed. (C) Upon the request of the director, each manufacturer or distributor shall furnish the director with the label for any commercial feed hethe manufacturer or distributor distributes in this state. Sec. 923.47. (A) For the purpose of enforcing sections 923.41 to 923.55 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted under those sections, the director of agriculture, or histhe director's agent, to the extent hethe director or the director's agent considers necessary, upon presenting credentials and a written inspection notice to the person in charge, may enter, during regular business hours, any factory, warehouse, or establishment where commercial feeds are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for distribution or any vehicle used to transport or hold feeds in order to inspect within a reasonable time and manner the factory, warehouse, establishment, vehicle, and any equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers, and labeling. The inspection may include verification of only such records and production and control procedures as necessary to determine compliance with the good manufacturing practice rules for drug-containing feeds adopted by rule under section 923.48 of the Revised Code. Official samples may be taken during the inspection. Upon completion of the inspection, the person in charge shall be so notified. If any official sample of commercial feed is taken during the inspection, at the completion of the inspection and prior to leaving the premises, the director or histhe director's agent shall give the person in charge a receipt that describes any sample taken and provide himthe person in charge with a portion of any sample if the person in charge so requests. At any time that the director is refused admittance to inspect, hethe director may obtain a search warrant describing what is to be inspected from a judge of a court of record in the jurisdiction where the inspection is to take place. (B) For the purpose of enforcing sections 923.41 to 923.55 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted under those sections, the director of agriculture, or histhe director's agent, to the extent hethe director or the director's agent considers necessary, upon the presentation of credentials, shall enter during regular business hours upon any public or private premises, including any vehicle used to transport or hold feeds, to obtain official samples of commercial feed and to examine any records that relate to the distribution of feed sampled. (C) The director shall maintain a laboratory with equipment and personnel necessary to effectively administer and enforce sections 923.41 to 923.55 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under those sections. The methods of sampling and analysis shall be those adopted by the association of official agricultural chemists AOAC international and other generally recognized sources prescribed by the director by rule. (D) The results of all analyses of official samples of commercial feed shall be forwarded to the distributor and to the purchaser. (E) Analytical tolerances shall be governed by rules adopted by the director. Sec. 924.07. (A) When the producers of an agricultural commodity who vote in a referendum favor a proposed marketing program, the director of agriculture shall order the program established and, if the marketing program does not provide for the election of an operating committee, appoint an operating committee consisting of producers of the commodity to administer the program. Each operating committee shall consist of not less than three nor more than fifteen producers. (B) Of the members first appointed to an operating committee, the director shall appoint approximately one-third for one-year terms, approximately one-third for two-year terms, and the remainder for three-year terms. Thereafter, the director shall appoint each member for a three-year term unless the appointee is to fill a vacancy in which case the appointee shall be appointed for the unexpired term. Each such subsequent appointment shall be made prior to the expiration date of the preceding or vacant term. (C) The director shall not appoint any member of an operating committee to serve more than three successive full three-year terms. (D) The director shall appoint members of each operating committee from a list of candidates recommended by the producers of the agricultural commodity for which the marketing program is established. Insofar as possible the members shall be equitably distributed by geographic and production areas. Any list of candidates recommended to the director by producers shall include not less than twice as many candidates as the number of members which are to be appointed, but in no case shall a list include fewer than three names. (E) The director, or the director's designee, is an ex officio member of each operating committee, with the right to vote. (F) Each member of an operating committee, except the director or the director's designee, is entitled to actual and necessary travel and incidental expenses while attending meetings of the committee or while engaged in the performance of official responsibilities delegated to the committee. No member of such a committee shall receive in excess of thirty dollars per day, in addition to such travel and incidental expenses, or for more than twenty-four days per year for duties performed as a member of the committee. (G) No person is civilly liable for any actions taken in good faith as a member or employee of an operating committee. Sec. 924.53. (A) The director of agriculture shall monitor the conduct of the Ohio grape industries committee to ensure that: (1) The committee is operating within the requirements of sections 924.51 to 924.55 of the Revised Code; (2) The committee's program is self-supporting; (3) The committee keeps all records that are required by agencies of the state. (B) The director may, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, adopt, rescind, or amend rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. (C) The director shall accomplish an audit of the books and records of the committee prior to the thirtieth day of September each yearbooks and records of the committee shall be made available to the auditor of state as part of the auditor of state's annual audit of the department of agriculture. Sec. 993.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Amusement ride" means any mechanical, aquatic, or inflatable device, or combination of those devices that carries or conveys passengers on, along, around, over, or through a fixed or restricted course or within a defined area for the purpose of providing amusement, pleasure, or excitement. "Amusement ride" includes carnival rides, bungee jumping facilities, and fair rides, but does not include passenger tramways as defined in section 4169.01 of the Revised Code, manufactured rock climbing walls in climbing facilities regulated under Chapter 4175. of the Revised Code, or amusement rides operated solely at trade shows for a limited period of time. For purposes of this division, "trade show" means a place of exhibition not open to the general public where amusement ride manufacturers display, promote, operate, and sell amusement rides to prospective purchasers. (B) "Temporary amusement ride" means an amusement ride that is relocated at least once per year with or without disassembly. (C) "Permanent amusement ride" means an amusement ride that is erected to remain a lasting part of the premises. (D) "Owner" means any person who owns or leases and controls or manages the operation of an amusement ride, and includes individuals, partnerships, corporations, both profit and nonprofit, and the state and any of its political subdivisions and their departments or agencies. (E) "Operation" means the use or operation, or both, of an amusement ride with riders. (F) "Rider" means any person who sits, stands, or is otherwise conveyed or carried as a passenger on an amusement ride, but does not include employees or agents of the owner of the amusement ride. (G) "Amusement ride operator" means any person causing the amusement ride to go, stop, or perform its function. (H) "Reassembly" means the installation, erection, or reconstruction of the main mechanical, safety, electrical, or electronic components of an amusement ride following transportation or storage and prior to operation. Replacement of mechanical, safety, electrical, or electronic components of an amusement ride for the purpose of repair or maintenance is not reassembly. (I) "Repair" means to restore an amusement ride to a condition equal to or better than original design specifications. (J) "Maintenance" means the preservation and upkeep of an amusement ride for the purpose of maintaining its designed operational capability. (K) "Inspection" means a physical examination of an amusement ride by an inspector for the purpose of approving the application for a permit. "Inspection" includes a reinspection. (L) "Accident" means an occurrence during the operation of an amusement ride that results in death or injury requiring immediate hospital admission. (M) "Serious injury" means an injury that does not require immediate hospital admission but does require medical treatment, other than first aid, by a physician. (N) "First aid" means the one-time treatment or subsequent observation of scratches, cuts not requiring stitches, burns, splinters, and contusions or a diagnostic procedure, including examinations and x-rays, that does not ordinarily require medical treatment even though provided by a physician or other licensed professional personnel. (O) "Advisory council" means the advisory council on amusement ride safety created by section 993.02 of the Revised Code. (P) "Safe operation" means, except as provided in section 993.10 of the Revised Code, the practical application of maintenance, inspection, and operational processes, as indicated by the manufacturer, owner, or advisory council, that secures a rider from threat of physical danger, harm, or loss. (Q) "Private facility" means any facility that is accessible only to members of the facility and not accessible to the general public, even upon payment of a fee or charge, and that requires approval for membership by a membership committee representing the current members who have a policy requiring monetary payment to belong to the facility. (R) "Bungee jumping" means a fall or jump from a height by an individual who is attached to an elastic cord that prevents the individual from hitting the ground, water, or other solid, semi-solid, liquid, or elastic surface. (S) "Bungee jumping facility" means a device or structure utilized for bungee jumping. (T) "Kiddie ride" means an amusement ride designed for use by children under thirteen years of age who are unaccompanied by another person. "Kiddie ride" includes a roller coaster that is not more than forty feet in elevation at any point on the ride. (U) "Climbing facility" has the same meaning as in section 4175.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 993.04. (A)(1) No person shall operate an amusement ride within the state without a permit issued by the director of agriculture under division (A)(2) of this section. The owner of an amusement ride, whether the ride is a temporary amusement ride or a permanent amusement ride, who desires to operate the amusement ride within the state shall, prior to the operation of the amusement ride and annually thereafter, submit to the department of agriculture an application for a permit, together with the appropriate permit and inspection fee, on a form to be furnished by the department. Prior to issuing any permit the department shall, within thirty days after the date on which it receives the application, inspect each amusement ride described in the application. The owner of an amusement ride shall have the amusement ride ready for inspection not later than two hours after the time that is requested by the person for the inspection. (2) For each amusement ride found to comply with the rules adopted by the director under division (B) of this section and division (B) of section 993.08 of the Revised Code, the director shall issue an annual permit, provided that evidence of liability insurance coverage for the amusement ride as required by section 993.06 of the Revised Code is on file with the department. (3) The director shall issue with each permit a decal indicating that the amusement ride has been issued the permit. The owner of the amusement ride shall affix the decal on the ride at a location where the decal is easily visible to the patrons of the ride. A copy of the permit shall be kept on file at the same address as the location of the amusement ride identified on the permit, and shall be made available for inspection, upon reasonable demand, by any person. An owner may operate an amusement ride prior to obtaining a permit, provided that the operation is for the purpose of testing the amusement ride or training amusement ride operators and other employees of the owner and the amusement ride is not open to the public. (B)(1) The director, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules providing for both of the following: (a) A schedule of fines, with no fine exceeding five thousand dollars, for violations of this chapter or any rules adopted under this division; (b) The classification of amusement rides and rules for the safe operation and inspection of all amusement rides as are necessary for amusement ride safety and for the protection of the general public. The classification of amusement rides must identify those rides that need more comprehensive inspection and testing in addition to regular state inspections, taking into account hidden components integral to the safety of the ride. (2)(a) Rules adopted by the director for the safe operation and inspection of amusement rides shall be reasonable and shall be based upon generally accepted engineering standards and practices. The rules shall establish a minimum number of inspections to be conducted on each ride depending on the size, complexity, nature of the ride, and the number of days the ride is in operation during the year for which the applicable permit is valid. The rules also shall require the minimum number of inspectors assigned to inspect a ride or rides to be reasonable and adequate given the number, size, complexity, and nature of the ride or rides. (b) In adopting rules under this section, the director may adopt by reference, in whole or in part, the national fire code or the national electrical code (NEC) prepared by the national fire protection association or the American national standards institute (ANSI), or any other principles, tests, or standards of nationally recognized technical or scientific authorities. (c) In adopting rules under this section, the director shall adopt, by reference, the following chapters of the American society for testing and materials (ASTM) international regarding amusement ride safety standards and any other equivalent national standard: (i) ASTM F1193-18; (ii) ASTM F770-18; (iii) ASTM F2291-18. (d) Insofar as is practicable and consistent with this chapter, rules adopted under this division shall be consistent with the rules of other states. (3) The department shall cause this chapter and the rules adopted in accordance with this division and division (B) of section 993.08 of the Revised Code to be published in pamphlet form and a copy to be furnished without charge to each owner of an amusement ride who holds a current permit or is an applicant therefor. (C) With respect to an application for a permit for an amusement ride, an owner may apply to the director for a waiver or modification of any rule adopted under division (B) of this section if there are practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships for the amusement ride to comply with the rules. Any application shall set forth the reasons for the request. The director, with the approval of the advisory council on amusement ride safety, may waive or modify the application of a rule to any amusement ride if the public safety is secure. Any authorization by the director under this division shall be in writing and shall set forth the conditions under which the waiver or modification is authorized, and the department shall retain separate records of all proceedings under this division. (D)(1) The director shall employ and provide for training of a chief inspector and additional inspectors and employees as may be necessary to administer and enforce this chapter. The director may appoint or contract with other persons to perform inspections of amusement rides, provided that the persons meet the qualifications for inspectors established by rules adopted under division (B) of this section and are not owners, or employees of owners, of any amusement ride subject to inspection under this chapter. When employing a new chief inspector or an additional inspector after November 6, 2019, the director shall give preference to the following: (a) An individual holding a level one or higher inspector certification from either the national association of amusement ride safety officials (NAARSO), the amusement industry manufacturers and suppliers (AIMS) international, or another substantially equivalent organization as determined by the director; and (b) An individual who intends, within one year of being hired as an inspector, to complete the requirements for issuance of a level one or higher inspector certification from NAARSO, AIMS International, or another substantially equivalent organization as determined by the director. (2) No person shall inspect an amusement ride who, within six months prior to the date of inspection, was an employee of the owner of the ride. (3) Before the director contracts with other persons to inspect amusement rides, the director shall seek the advice of the advisory council on amusement ride safety on whether to contract with those persons. The advice shall not be binding upon the director. After having received the advice of the council, the director may proceed to contract with inspectors in accordance with the procedures specified in division (E)(2) of section 1711.11 of the Revised Code. (4) With the advice and consent of the advisory council on amusement ride safety, the director may employ a special consultant to conduct an independent investigation of an amusement ride accident. This consultant need not be in the civil service of the state, but shall have qualifications to conduct the investigation acceptable to the council. (E)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(1) of this section, the department shall charge the following amusement ride fees: 1 2 A Permit, non-inflatable ride $225 B Permit, inflatable ride $100 C Annual inspection and reinspection per ride: D Kiddie rides $100 E Family rides $200 F Major rides $300 G Spectacular rides $400 H Family/portable roller coasters $1,200 I Tower rides $1,800 J Roller coasterLarge roller coasters $1,200 $4,000 K Aerial lifts or bungee jumping facilities $450 L Go karts, per kart $5 M Inflatable rides, three or fewer that are inspected at the same time at the same location and that are owned by the same owner $100 per inflatable ride N Inflatable rides, four to ten that are inspected at the same time at the same location and that are owned by the same owner $75 per inflatable ride O Inflatable rides, eleven or more that are inspected at the same time at the same location and that are owned by the same owner $50 per inflatable ride P Other rides $160 Q Midseason operational inspection per ride $25 R Expedited inspection per ride $100 S Failure to cancel scheduled inspection per ride $100 T Failure to have amusement ride ready for inspection per ride $100 The go kart inspection fee is in addition to the inspection fee for the go kart track. The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing an annual fee that is less than one hundred five dollars for an inspection and reinspection of an inflatable ride. In adopting the rules, the director shall ensure that the fee reasonably reflects the costs of inspection and reinspection of an inflatable ride. If the director issues a permit for an inflatable ride for a time period of less than one year, the director shall charge a prorated fee for the permit equal to one-twelfth of the annual permit fee multiplied by the number of full months for which the permit is issued. The fees for an expedited inspection, failure to cancel a scheduled inspection, and failure to have an amusement ride ready for inspection do not apply to go karts. As used in division (E)(1) of this section, "expedited inspection" means an inspection of an amusement ride by the department not later than ten days after the owner of the amusement ride files an application for a permit under this section. (2) All fees and fines collected by the department under this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the amusement ride inspection fund, which is hereby created, and shall be used only for the purpose of administering and enforcing section 1711.11 of the Revised Code and this chapter. (3) The owner of an amusement ride shall be required to pay a reinspection fee only if the reinspection is required by division (B)(2) of this section or rules adopted under that division, if the reinspection was conducted at the owner's request under division (F) of this section, if the reinspection is required by division (F) of this section because of an accident, or if the reinspection is required by division (F) of section 993.07 of the Revised Code. If a reinspection is conducted at the request of the chief officer of a fair, festival, or event where the ride is operating, the reinspection fee shall be charged to the fair, festival, or event. (4) The rules adopted under division (B) of this section shall define "roller coaster," "aerial lifts,""inflatable ride," "go karts," and "other rides" "kiddie ride," "family ride," "major ride," "spectacular ride," "family/portable roller coaster," "tower ride," and "large roller coaster" for purposes of determining the fees under division (E) of this section. The rules shall define "other rides" to include go kart tracks. (F) A reinspection of an amusement ride shall take place if an accident occurs, if the owner of the ride or the chief officer of the fair, festival, or event where the ride is operating requests a reinspection, if the chief inspector determines reinspection is necessary in accordance with section 993.042 of the Revised Code, or if the reinspection is required by division (F) of section 993.07 of the Revised Code. (G) As a supplement to its annual inspection of a temporary amusement ride, the department may inspect the ride during each scheduled event, as listed in the schedule of events provided to the department by the owner pursuant to division (C) of section 993.07 of the Revised Code, at which the ride is operated in this state. These supplemental inspections are in addition to any other inspection or reinspection of the ride as may be required under this chapter or rules adopted under it, and the owner of the temporary amusement ride is not required to pay an inspection or reinspection fee for this supplemental inspection unless the supplemental inspection is being conducted pursuant to division (B)(2) of this section or rules adopted under that division. Nothing in this division shall be construed to prohibit the owner of a temporary amusement ride having a valid permit to operate in this state from operating the ride at a scheduled event before the department conducts a supplemental inspection. (H) The department may annually conduct a midseason operational inspection of every amusement ride upon which it conducts an annual inspection pursuant to division (A) of this section. The midseason operational inspection is in addition to any other inspection or reinspection of the amusement ride as may be required pursuant to this chapter. The owner of an amusement ride shall submit to the department, at the time determined by the department, the midseason operational inspection fee specified in division (E) of this section. The director, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules specifying the time period during which the department will conduct midseason operational inspections. Sec. 1327.52. Any weights and measures official elected or appointed for a county or municipality shall have the duties enumerated in divisions (I) to (M) and (T) of section 1327.50 of the Revised Code, and the powers enumerated in section 1327.51 of the Revised Code. These powers and duties shall extend to the respective jurisdictions, except that the jurisdiction of a county official shall not extend to any municipal corporation for which a weights and measures official has been appointed. The director of agriculture shall advise and assist these officials. Sec. 1327.55. Except as otherwise provided by the director of agriculture or by firmly established trade customs and practices, commodities shall be sold as follows: (A) Commodities in liquid form shall be sold by liquid measure or by weight; (B) Commodities not in liquid form shall be sold only by weight, measure, or countycount, or a combination thereof; (C) The method of sale of commodities shall provide accurate quantity information that enables the buyer to make price and quantity comparisons. Sec. 3715.04. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Certificate of health and freesale" means a document issued by the director of agriculture that certifies to states and countries receiving products that the products have been produced and warehoused in this state under sanitary conditions at a food processing establishment or at a place of business of a manufacturer of over-the-counter drugs or cosmetics, as applicable, that has been inspected by the department of agriculture. Other names of documents that are synonymous with "certificate of health and freesale" include, but are not limited to, "sanitary certificate of health and freesale"; "certificate of origin"; "certificate of freesale"; "certificate of health and origin"; "certificate of freesale, sanitary and purity"; and "certificate of freesale, health and origin." (2) "Food processing establishment" has the same meaning as in section 3715.021 of the Revised Code. (B) Upon the request of a food processing establishment, manufacturer of over-the-counter drugs, or manufacturer of cosmetics, the director may issue a certificate of health and freesale after determining that conditions at the establishment or place of business of the manufacturer, as applicable, have been found to be sanitary through an inspection conducted pursuant to this chapter. For each certificate issued, the director shall may charge the establishment or manufacturer a fee in the an amount of twenty dollarsestablished in division (G) of section 901.43 of the Revised Code. The director shall deposit all fees collected under this section to the credit of the food safety fund created in section 915.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4707.091. (A)(A)(1) Prior to the expiration of an auctioneer's license, an auctioneer may submit an application to the department of agriculture, on forms provided by the department, to place the license on deposit with the department for a period not to exceed two years. Not later than fourteen days after receipt of an the application under this section, the department shall accept or deny the application. (2) If a licensee fails to place the license on deposit prior to expiration of the auctioneer license, the director of agriculture or the director's designee, may grant a medical exception upon written request by the licensee to retroactively place the auctioneer license on deposit. To receive an exception, the licensee shall submit along with the request satisfactory proof that a medical exception is warranted. (B) If the department accepts the application, an auctioneer who has a license on deposit with the department under this section, the auctioneer shall not act as an auctioneer while the license is on deposit. In addition, such an auctioneer shall not be required to pay an assessment under section 4707.25 of the Revised Code. (C) An auctioneer may reacquire a license on deposit from the department if the auctioneer does all of the following prior to reacquisition: (1) Submits a written request to the department that contains the business address and telephone number of the auctioneer; (2) Pays a reactivation fee for the license in the following amount: (a) In the case of an auctioneer whose license is reacquired during the first half of the biennium according to the biennial schedule established in division (A) of section 4707.10 of the Revised Code, two hundred dollars; (b) In the case of an auctioneer whose license is reacquired during the second half of the biennium according to that biennial schedule, one hundred dollars. (3) Pays the assessment that is levied under section 4707.25 of the Revised Code for the current year, if applicable; (4) Provides proof of financial responsibility as required in section 4707.11 of the Revised Code, if applicable; (5) Complies with any other requirement established in rules adopted by the director under section 4707.19 of the Revised Code; (6) Provides proof of completion of the continuing education requirements established in section 4707.101 of the Revised Code. (D) If an auctioneer, at the time of placing the auctioneer's license on deposit, has not maintained proof of financial responsibility for the entire period of time required under section 4707.11 of the Revised Code, the auctioneer, beginning at the time of reacquisition, shall maintain proof of financial responsibility for the remainder of the time required under that section. Sec. 4707.151. (A) No person shall engage in bid rigging. (B) As used in this section, "bid : (1) "Bid rigging" means a conspiracy between auctioneers, any participants in an auction, or any other persons who agree not to bid against each other at an auction or who otherwise conspire to decrease or increase the number or amounts of bids offered at auction. (2) "Auction" includes an online auction. Section 2. That existing sections 905.39, 905.55, 905.59, 915.14, 917.20, 918.12, 923.43, 923.47, 924.07, 924.53, 993.01, 993.04, 1327.52, 1327.55, 3715.04, 4707.091, and 4707.151 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That section 1345.021 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 4. (A) Notwithstanding section 993.04 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, beginning on the effective date of this section and expiring on November 30, 2027, the Department of Agriculture shall charge the following amusement ride fees: 1 2 A Permit, non-inflatable $225 B Permit, inflatable ride $162.50 C Annual inspection and reinspection per ride: D Kiddie rides $100 E Family rides $180 F Major rides $230 G Spectacular rides $280 H Family/portable roller coasters $1,200 I Tower rides $1,300 J Large roller coasters $3,250 K Go karts, per kart $5 L Inflatable rides, three or fewer that are inspected at the same time at the same location and that are owned by the same owner $102 per inflatable ride M Inflatable rides, four to ten that are inspected at the same time at the same location and that are owned by the same owner $89.50 per inflatable ride N Inflatable rides, eleven or more that are inspected at the same time at the same location and that are owned by the same owner $77 per inflatable ride O Midseason operational inspection per ride $25 P Expedited inspection per ride $100 Q Failure to cancel scheduled inspection per ride $100 R Failure to have amusement ride ready for inspection per ride $100 The go kart inspection fee is in addition to the inspection fee for the go kart track. The fees for an expedited inspection, failure to cancel a scheduled inspection, and failure to have an amusement ride ready for inspection do not apply to go karts. As used in this section, "expedited inspection" has the same meaning as division (E)(1) of section 993.04 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act. (B) Beginning on and after December 1, 2027, such fees shall be levied in accordance with division (E)(1) of section 993.04 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________